Wisconsin, session 2025, AB396.
do enact as follows:AB396,11Section 1. 13.124 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB396,2,7213.124 (1) (b) The Subject to sub. (4), the speaker of the assembly, in his or her 3sole discretion, may obtain legal counsel other than from the department of justice, 4with the cost of representation paid from the appropriation under s. 20.765 (1) (a), 5in any action in which the assembly is a party or in which the interests of the 6assembly are affected, as determined by the speaker. The speaker shall approve all 7financial costs and terms of representation.AB396,28Section 2. 13.124 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB396,2,14913.124 (2) (b) The Subject to sub. (4), the senate majority leader, in his or her 10sole discretion, may obtain legal counsel other than from the department of justice, 11with the cost of representation paid from the appropriation under s. 20.765 (1) (b), 12in any action in which the senate is a party or in which the interests of the senate 13are affected, as determined by the senate majority leader. The senate majority 14leader shall approve all financial costs and terms of representation.AB396,315Section 3. 13.124 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB396,2,221613.124 (3) (b) The Subject to sub. (4), the cochairpersons of the joint 17committee on legislative organization, in their sole discretion, may obtain legal 18counsel other than from the department of justice, with the cost of representation 19paid from the appropriation under s. 20.765 (1) (a) or (b), as determined by the 20cochairpersons, in any action in which the legislature is a party or in which the 21interests of the legislature are affected, as determined by the cochairpersons. The 22cochairpersons shall approve all financial costs and terms of representation.AB396,423Section 4. 13.124 (4) of the statutes is created to read:AB396,3,42413.124 (4) The assembly, the senate, and the houses jointly, and any legislator 1or legislative committee, may not obtain legal counsel other than from the 2department of justice unless that action is submitted to the full house, or houses in 3the case of a joint appointment, and the appointment of legal counsel is approved by 4a majority of the members present and voting of the house or houses.AB396,3,55